Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
PART 3
T

Y COBB MEMORIAL

Administrative Rules and Regulations.

- Transfer of Ty Cobb Baseball Memorial Commission, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Environmental Protection, Subject 391-5-7.

12-3-170. Making and developing plans for administration and maintenance of memorial or shrine.

It shall be the duty of the Department of Natural Resources to proceed with the making and developing of the plans for administering and maintaining a memorial or shrine at or in the vicinity of Royston, Franklin County, Georgia, to perpetuate the memory of the late Ty Cobb.

(Ga. L. 1962, p. 706, § 2.)

Editor's notes.

- Pursuant to Ga. L. 1976, p. 736, the Ty Cobb Baseball Memorial was conveyed to the City of Royston on October 15, 1976.

12-3-171. Powers of department as to memorial or shrine.

The department shall have the following powers and authority under this part:

To acquire, hold, and dispose of personal property for accomplishing the purposes of the department under this part;

To accept donations, grants, and subsidies from any source and use them in purchasing and improving such property as the department may deem necessary to effectuate its aims and purposes under this part;

To employ special talent, advertise, and provide such recreational facilities as it may deem necessary and advisable;

To provide for public admission to such memorial or shrine and to provide for revenue for maintenance and improvements by charging admissions or in other ways as may be desired, provided that all such income shall be used for the advancement of the purposes of the department under this part;

To acquire in its own name, by donation or by purchase, on such terms and conditions and in such manner as it may deem proper, in accordance with and subject to the provisions of law, real property or rights or easements therein or franchises necessary or convenient for the purposes specified in this part; and to lease, make contracts with respect to the use of, or dispose of the same in any manner as it deems best;

To make contracts and to execute all instruments necessary or convenient for the purposes expressed in this part, including contracts for construction of such memorial or shrine and improvements thereto;

To construct, erect, acquire, own, repair, remodel, maintain, add to, extend, improve, equip, operate, and manage self-liquidating projects or concessions to be located on property owned, leased, or otherwise used by the department;

To accept loans or grants of money, materials, or property of any kind from the United States of America or any agency or instrumentality thereof, including the Department of Housing and Urban Development or any similar agency, or from any state or any political subdivision, agency, or instrumentality thereof, upon such terms and conditions as the lending or granting body may impose;

To fix and recommend from time to time fees, rentals, and other charges for the use of the facilities and services furnished by the department; to charge and collect the same; and to lease and to make contracts with any person with respect to the use of any facility or part thereof;

To provide for honorary committees of representative citizens in every section of the United States who are interested in perpetuating the name of Ty Cobb;

To do all things necessary or convenient to carry out the powers expressed in this part.

(Ga. L. 1962, p. 706, § 3; Ga. L. 1972, p. 1015, § 1508; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 12.)

12-3-172. Construction of part.

This part shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes hereof.

(Ga. L. 1962, p. 706, § 4.)